District of Columbia statutes.
10-1503

Establishment of Reservation 13 Benefit Area.

(a)

There is established a Reservation 13 Benefit Area (“R13BA”), which shall be comprised of the 67 acres of land historically know as Reservation 13.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

History

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-300, § 4, 50 DCR 406
Feb. 6, 2004, D.C. Law 15-69, § 2(a), 50 DCR 9824
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 89(a), 52 DCR 2638

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-69 deleted the subsection (a) designation; and repealed subsecs. (b) and (c) which had read as follows:
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsecs. (b) and (c), validated previously made technical corrections.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Draft Master Plan for Public Reservation 13 Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-3, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3783).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Draft Master Plan for Public Reservation 13 Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-13, January 27, 2003, 50 DCR 1488).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Draft Master Plan for Public Reservation 13 Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-273, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 40).